cs: Konstrukce trampolíny: Vinutá pružina; Bez pružiny; Jiné
th: การออกแบบแทรมโพลีน: คอยล์สปริง; ไร้สปริง; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Design de trampolim: Suspensão de mola; Sem molas; Outro
en: Trampoline design: Coil spring; Springfree; Other
ko: 트램펄린 디자인: 코일 스프링; 비스프링식; 기타
nb: Trampolinedesign: Spiralfjær; Fjærfri; Annet
ja: トランポリンの種類: コイルスプリング; スプリングフリー; その他
lt-LT: Batuto dizainas: Spyruoklė; Be spyruoklių; Kita
tr: Trambolin tasarımı: Helezon yay; Yaysız; Diğer
pt-BR: Formato do trampolim: Mola helicoidal; Sem mola; Outro
sv: Trampolinkonstruktion: Spiralfjäder; Vårfri; Övrigt
hu: Trambulin kialakítása: Tekercsrugó; Rugómentes; Egyéb
it: Design del trampolino: Molle elicoidali; Senza molla; Altro
hr-HR: Dizajn trampolina: Zavojna opruga; Bez opruge; Ostalo
da: Trampolindesign: Spiralfjeder; Fjederfri; Andet
el: Σχέδιο τραμπολίνου: Σπειροειδές ελατήριο; Χωρίς άνοιξη; Άλλο
sl-SI: Dizajn trampolina: Vijačna vzmet; Brez vzmeti; Drugo
bg-BG: Дизайн на батут: Спирална пружина; Без пружина; Други
zh-CN: 蹦床设计: 螺旋弹簧; 思蹦飞; 其他
nl: Ontwerp trampoline: Spiraalveer; Zonder veer; Andere
ru: Конструкция батута: Спиральная пружина; Без пружины; Другой
zh-TW: 彈跳床設計: 螺旋彈簧; 無彈簧; 其他
ro-RO: Design trambulină: Arc elicoidal; Fără arc; Altele
vi: Thiết kế tấm bạt lò xo: Lò xo cuộn; Không có lò xo; Khác
sk-SK: Dizajn trampolíny: Vinutá pružina; Bez pružiny; Iné
fr: Conception du trampoline: Ressorts hélicoïdaux; Sans ressort; Autre
de: Trampolin-Design: Spiralfeder; Federlos; Sonstiges
es: Diseño de trampolín: Resorte en espiral; Sin muelle; Otros
fi: Trampoliinin muotoilu: Kierrejousi; Jouseton; Muu
pl: Projekt trampoliny: Sprężyna zwojowa; Bez sprężyn; Inne